Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-912
Prohibited acts relating to bovine;
violation; penalty.

(1) No person shall intentionally trip, cause to fall, or
drag any bovine by its tail by any means for the purpose of entertainment,
sport, practice, or contest. The intentional tripping, causing to fall, or
dragging of any bovine by its tail by any means for the purpose of entertainment,
sport, practice, or contest shall not be considered a commonly accepted practice
occurring in conjunction with sanctioned rodeos, animal racing, or pulling
contests.

(2) Violation
of this section is a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 2010, LB865, § 12.